Maryland, session 2025, SB0250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–107.
(a) There is a Maryland Clean Air Fund.
(b) Except as provided in § 2–1002(g) of this title, all application fees, permit fees,
renewal fees, and funds collected by the Department under this title, Title 6, Subtitle 4 of
this article, or received from the Maryland Strategic Energy Investment Fund under §
9–20B–05(g)(3)(iii) of the State Government Article, including any civil or administrative
penalty or any fine imposed by a court under these provisions, shall be paid into the
Maryland Clean Air Fund.
(c) (1) Subject to the appropriation process in the annual operating budget,
the Department shall use the Maryland Clean Air Fund for:
(i) Activities conducted under this title that are related to
identifying, MITIGATING, monitoring, REDUCING, and regulating air pollution in [this]
THE State, including program development of these activities as provided in the State
budget; and
(ii) Providing grants to local governments to supplement funding for
programs conducted by local governments that are consistent with this title and the State
program.
(2) Subject to Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article
(Administrative Procedure Act – Regulations), the Department shall adopt rules and
regulations for the management and use of the money in the Fund.
– 3 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) At the end of the fiscal year, the Department shall:
(i) Prepare an annual report on:
1. The Maryland Clean Air Fund that includes an accounting
of all financial receipts and expenditures to and from the Fund; and
2. Any relevant information regarding the federal approval
process, the effectiveness of the permitting program, and any other issues related to the
operation of the permitting program established under § 2–401 of this title;
(ii) Provide a copy of the report to the General Assembly, as provided
under § 2–1257 of the State Government Article; and
(iii) Upon request, make the report available to permit holders under
this title.
(4) [When the Fund equals or exceeds a maximum limit of $2,000,000,
additional money received for the Fund by the Department shall be deposited to the
General Fund] MONEY DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND IS NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF
THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND MAY NOT REVERT TO THE
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
2–403.
(a) (1) The Department, by regulation, shall require and collect a fee for each
permit issued under § 2–401 of this subtitle.
(2) In adopting the regulations under this section, the Department shall
consult with industry to determine that the permit fee is reasonable and directly related to
the actual cost of the permitting and regulatory activity, and does not exceed a certain
dollar amount.
(b) (1) The amount of the fees shall cover:
(i) The reasonable cost of reviewing and acting on the application
for the permits;
(ii) The reasonable costs incurred in implementing and enforcing the
terms and conditions of the permits, exclusive of any court costs or other costs associated
with any enforcement actions; and
(iii) The costs identified in § 502(b)(3) of the Clean Air Act
Amendments of 1990.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(2) Fees assessed and collected under this section shall be used exclusively
for the development and administration of the permit program under this subtitle.
(c) (1) The fee established under this section may not exceed[:
(i) $50] $200 per ton of regulated emissions[; and
(ii) $500,000 for any single source in calendar years 2008 and 2009].
(2) For purposes of calculating fees under this section, carbon dioxide
emissions shall be excluded.
(3) The fee established under this section may be adjusted to reflect
changes in the Consumer Price Index[, as authorized by 40 C.F.R. Part 70 (Operating
Permit Program)].
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Environment
1–301.
(a) The Secretary shall carry out and enforce the provisions of this article and the
rules and regulations adopted under this article.
(b) The Secretary may delegate duties, powers, and functions as provided in this
article to a health officer for a county or to another county official authorized to administer
and enforce environmental laws.
(c) In those counties where a county official other than the health officer is
authorized to administer and enforce State environmental laws under this section, the
county shall establish minimum qualifications for that county official that include
standards of education and experience related to environmental issues.
(D) (1) THE IF THE DEPARTMENT PROCESSES AND ISSUES ON–SITE
SEWAGE DISPOSAL PERMITS OR INDIVIDUAL WELL CONSTRUCTION PERMITS, THE
DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE A FEE FOR PROCESSING AND ISSUING ON–SITE SEWAGE
DISPOSAL PERMITS AND INDIVIDUAL WELL CONSTRUCTION THE PERMITS IN A
COUNTY IF:
(I) 1. THE DEPARTMENT WITHDRAWS THE AUTHORITY
DELEGATED UNDER THIS SECTION TO PROCESS AND ISSUE ON–SITE SEWAGE
DISPOSAL PERMITS OR INDIVIDUAL WELL CONSTRUCTION PERMITS FROM A HEALTH
– 5 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
OFFICER FOR THE COUNTY OR ANOTHER COUNTY OFFICIAL AUTHORIZED TO
ADMINISTER AND ENFORCE ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS; OR
2. THE HEALTH OFFICER OR COUNTY OFFICIAL
RETURNS THE DELEGATED AUTHORITY TO THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(II) A A LICENSED ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SPECIALIST
REVIEWS AND APPROVES THE PERMITS.
(2) (I) THE FEES:
1. SHALL BE ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN
REGULATION; AND
2. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, MAY NOT EXCEED $575.
(II) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE DEPARTMENT MAY ANNUALLY INCREASE THE FEES UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PERCENTAGE
INCREASE IN THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS FOR THE
WASHINGTON METROPOLITAN AREA DURING THE PREVIOUS YEAR.
2. THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ANNUALLY INCREASE
THE FEES UNDER THIS SUBSECTION BY MORE THAN 3%.
(3) THE FEES COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE MARYLAND CLEAN WATER FUND IN §
9–320 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(d)] (E) (1) (i) On or before October 1 of each year, the Secretary, in
consultation with the Attorney General, shall submit to the Legislative Policy Committee,
THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION, ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, THE
SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE ENVIRONMENT AND
TRANSPORTATION COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, a report on enforcement
activities conducted by the Department during the previous fiscal year.
(ii) The report shall:
1. Include the information required under this subsection
and any additional information concerning environmental enforcement that the Secretary
decides to provide;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
2. Be available to the public as soon as it is forwarded to the
Legislative Policy Committee;
3. Include information on the total number of permits and
licenses issued by or filed with the Department at any time and still in effect as of the last
date of the fiscal year immediately preceding the date on which the report is filed;
4. Include information concerning specific enforcement
actions taken with respect to the permits and licenses during the immediately preceding
fiscal year; and
5. Include information on the type and number of contacts or
consultations with businesses concerning compliance with State environmental laws.
(iii) The information required in the report under paragraph (3) of
this subsection shall be organized according to each program specified.
(2) The report shall state the total amount of money as a result of
enforcement actions, as of the end of the immediately preceding fiscal year:
(i) Deposited in the Maryland Clean Air Fund;
(ii) Deposited in the Maryland Oil Disaster Containment, Clean–Up
and Contingency Fund;
(iii) Deposited in the Nontidal Wetland Compensation Fund;
(iv) Deposited in the Maryland Hazardous Substance Control Fund;
(v) Recovered by the Department from responsible parties in
accordance with § 7–221 of this article; and
(vi) Deposited in the Maryland Clean Water Fund.
(3) (i) The report shall include the information specified in
subparagraphs (ii), (iii), (iv), and (v) of this paragraph for each of the following programs in
the Department:
1. Ambient air quality control under Title 2, Subtitle 4 of this
article;
2. Oil pollution under Title 4, Subtitle 4 of this article;
3. Nontidal wetlands under Title 5, Subtitle 9 of this article;
4. Asbestos under Title 6, Subtitle 4 of this article;
– 7 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
5. Lead paint under Title 6, Subtitle 8 of this article;
6. Controlled hazardous substances under Title 7, Subtitle 2
of this article;
7. Water supply, sewerage systems, and refuse disposal
systems under Title 9, Subtitle 2 of this article;
8. Water discharges under Title 9, Subtitle 3 of this article;
9. Drinking water under Title 9, Subtitle 4 of this article; and
10. Wetlands under Title 16, Subtitle 2 of this article.
(ii) For each of the programs set forth in subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph, the Department shall provide the total number or amount of:
1. Final permits or licenses issued to a person or facility, as
appropriate, and not surrendered, suspended, or revoked;
2. Inspections, audits, or spot checks performed at facilities
permitted;
3. Injunctions obtained;
4. Show cause, remedial, and corrective action orders issued;
5. Stop work orders;
6. Administrative or civil penalties obtained;
7. Criminal actions charged, convictions obtained,
imprisonment time ordered, and criminal fines received; and
8. Any other actions taken by the Department to enforce the
requirements of the applicable environmental program, including:
A. Notices of the removal or encapsulation of asbestos under
§ 6–414.1 of this article; and
B. Actions enforcing user charges against industrial users
under § 9–341 of this article.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(iii) In addition to the information required in subparagraph (ii) of
this paragraph, for the Lead Paint Program under Title 6, Subtitle 8 of this article, the
report shall include the total number or amount of:
1. Affected properties registered; and
2. Inspectors or other persons accredited by the Department,
for whom accreditation has not been surrendered, suspended, or revoked.
(iv) In addition to the information required in subparagraph (ii) of
this paragraph, for the Controlled Hazardous Substances Program under Title 7, Subtitle
2 of this article, the report shall include the following lists, updated to reflect the most
recent information available for the immediately preceding fiscal year:
1. Possible controlled hazardous substance sites compiled in
accordance with § 7–223(a) of this article;
2. Proposed sites listed in accordance with § 7–223(c) of this
article at which the Department intends to conduct preliminary site assessments; and
3. Hazardous waste sites in the disposal site registry
compiled in accordance with § 7–223(f) of this article.
(v) In addition to the information required in subparagraph (ii) of
this paragraph, for the Drinking Water Program, the report shall include the total number
of:
1. Actions to prevent public water system contamination or
to respond to a Safe Drinking Water Act emergency under §§ 9–405 and 9–406 of this
article; and
2. Notices given to the public by public water systems under
§ 9–410 of this article.
4–104.
(a) In this section, “responsible personnel” means any foreman, superintendent,
or project engineer who is in charge of on–site clearing and grading operations or sediment
control associated with a construction project.
(b) (1) After July 1, 1983, any applicant for sediment and erosion control plan
approval shall certify to the appropriate jurisdiction that any responsible personnel
involved in the construction project will have a certificate of attendance at a Department
[of the Environment] approved training program for the control of sediment and erosion
before beginning the project.
– 9 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A certificate shall be [valid]:
(I) VALID for a 3–year period[. A certificate shall be automatically];
AND
(II) AUTOMATICALLY renewed unless the Department [of the
Environment] notifies the certificate holder that additional training is required.
(c) The appropriate governmental entity authorized to approve grading and
sediment control plans may waive the requirement of this section for the responsible
personnel on any project involving four or fewer residential units.
(d) Any person may develop and conduct a training program if the program
content and instructor are approved by and meet the requirements set by the Department
[of the Environment].
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH BY REGULATION A FEE FOR
PROCESSING AND ISSUING THE CERTIFICATION.
(2) A FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE SET AT
A RATE THAT PRODUCES FUNDS APPROXIMATELY THE SAME AS THE COST OF
PROCESSING AND ISSUING THE CERTIFICATION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEPOSIT ANY FEE COLLECTED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION INTO THE MARYLAND CLEAN WATER FUND IN § 9–320 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
4–411.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Barrel” means any measure of petroleum products or its by–products
which consists of 42.0 U.S. gallons of liquid measure.
(3) “Fund” means the Maryland Oil Disaster Containment, Clean–Up and
Contingency Fund.
(4) “Transfer” means the offloading or onloading of oil [in] INTO the State
from or to any commercial vessel, barge, tank truck, tank car, pipeline, or any other means
used for transporting oil.
(b) A person other than a vessel or barge may not transfer oil [in] INTO the State
without a license.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(c) (2) The fee on any barrel TRANSFERRED INTO THE STATE UNDER A
LICENSE shall be [imposed]:
(I) PAID BY THE LICENSEE THAT OWNS THE OIL WHEN THE OIL
IS FIRST TRANSFERRED INTO THE STATE; AND
(II) IMPOSED only once, at the point of first transfer [in] INTO the
State.
(3) The [license] fee UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION shall
be[:
(i) Credited] CREDITED to the Maryland Oil Disaster Containment,
Clean–Up and Contingency Fund and based on:
[1.] (I) Before July 1, [2024] 2030, a [7.75] 9 cents per
barrel fee for oil transferred [in] INTO the State; and
[2.] (II) On or after July 1, [2024] 2030, a 5 cents per barrel
fee for oil transferred [in] INTO the State[; and
(ii) Until July 1, 2024, based on an additional 0.25 cent per barrel
fee for oil transferred in the State and credited to the Oil Contaminated Site Environmental
Cleanup Fund as described in Subtitle 7 of this title].
(7) The Department shall [promulgate rules and] ADOPT regulations,
establish audit procedures for the audit of licensees, and prescribe and publish forms as
may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.
[(d) As a condition precedent to the issuance or renewal of a license, the
Department shall require satisfactory evidence that the applicant has implemented or is in
the process of implementing State and federal plans and regulations to control pollution
related to oil, petroleum products, and their by–products and the abatement thereof when
a discharge occurs.]
[(h)] (G) (1) The Department shall provide the standing committees of the
Maryland General Assembly with primary jurisdiction over this section with a status report
on the Fund on or before January 1 of each year in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
(2) The report shall include an accounting of all money expended for each
of the purposes specified in subsection [(g)] (F) of this section.
5–203.1.
– 11 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Commercial activity” means a project or activity undertaken for
consideration, regardless of whether a profit is made.
(ii) “Commercial activity” includes:
1. A subdivision;
2. A development; and
3. Constructing or operating a marina.
(3) “Commercial building” means a building that is used primarily for
commercial activity.
(4) “Development” means a project for the construction of:
(i) Two or more residential dwelling units;
(ii) A commercial structure; or
(iii) An industrial structure.
(5) “Dwelling unit” means a property that contains:
(i) One or more rooms used as a residence;
(ii) Kitchen facilities; and
(iii) Bathroom facilities.
(6) “Major project” means a project that:
(i) Proposes to permanently impact 5,000 square feet or more of
wetlands or waterways, including the 100–year floodplain;
(ii) Is located in an area identified as potentially impacting a
nontidal wetland of special State concern by a geographical information system database
that:
1. Has been developed and maintained by the Department of
Natural Resources; and
2. Is used by the Department to screen incoming
applications; or
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(iii) Requires the issuance of a public notice by the Department.
(7) “Marina” means a facility for the mooring, docking, or storing of more
than 10 vessels on tidal navigable waters, including a commercial, noncommercial, or
community facility.
(8) “Minor project” means a project that:
(i) Proposes to permanently impact less than 5,000 square feet of
wetlands or waterways, including the 100–year floodplain; and
(ii) Does not meet the definition of a major project.
(9) “Residential activity” means a noncommercial activity that is conducted
on residential property.
(10) (i) “Residential property” means improved property that is used
primarily as a residence or unimproved property that is zoned for use as a residence.
(ii) “Residential property” includes:
1. Property owned by a homeowners’ association; and
2. A condominium.
(iii) “Residential property” does not include:
1. A commercial building;
2. A marina; or
3. A residential apartment complex or building.
(11) (i) “Subdivision” means the division of a lot, tract, or parcel of land
into two or more lots, plots, sites, tracts, parcels, or other divisions for the immediate or
future purpose of selling or development.
(ii) “Subdivision” includes resubdivision.
(12) “TIER II HIGH QUALITY WATERSHED” MEANS THE LAND AND
WATER AREA WHICH DRAINS TOWARD OR INTO A TIER II HIGH QUALITY WATER AS
DESIGNATED AND IDENTIFIED IN A GEOGRAPHIC INFORMATION SYSTEM BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
– 13 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) Except as provided under paragraphs (2), (3), [and] (6), AND (7) of this
subsection, all applications for wetlands and waterways authorizations issued by the
Department under §§ 5–503 and 5–906 of this title and §§ 16–202, 16–302, and 16–307 of
this article or wetlands licenses issued by the Board of Public Works under § 16–202 of this
article shall be accompanied by an application fee as follows:
(i) For an application for a minor project or general permit.....[$750]
$980;
(ii) For an application for a minor modification………...[$250] $330;
(iii) For an application for a major project with a proposed permanent
impact of:
1. Less than 1/4 acre………………………….[$1,500] $1,950;
2. At least 1/4 acre, but less than 1/2 acre....[$3,000] $3,890;
3. At least 1/2 acre, but less than 3/4 acre…...[$4,500]
$5,830;
4. At least 3/4 acre, but less than 1 acre…...[$6,000] $7,780;
and
5. 1 acre or more.....the impact area in acres multiplied by
[$7,500] $9,720; and
(iv) For an application for a major modification…….[$1,500] $1,950.
(2) The following are exempt from the application fees established under
paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) Regulated activities conducted by the State, a municipal
corporation, county, bicounty or multicounty agency under Division II of the Land Use
Article or Division II of the Public Utilities Article, or a unit of the State, a municipal
corporation, or a county;
(ii) Performance of agricultural best management practices
contained in a soil conservation and water quality plan approved by the appropriate soil
conservation district;
(iii) Performance of forestry best management practices contained in
an erosion and sediment control plan:
1. Prepared by a registered forester; and
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
2. Approved by the appropriate soil conservation district;
(iv) Stream restoration, vegetative shoreline stabilization, wetland
creation, or other project in which the primary effect is to enhance the State’s wetland or
water resources; and
(v) Aquacultural activities for which the Department of Natural
Resources has issued a permit under Title 4, Subtitle 11A of the Natural Resources Article.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, the following
shall be minor projects and subject to the appropriate application fee under [paragraph]
PARAGRAPHS (1)(i) and (ii) AND (7)(I) of this subsection:
(i) A residential activity issued a permit under §§ 5–503 and 5–906
of this title and §§ 16–202, 16–302, and 16–307 of this article; and
(ii) A mining activity undertaken on affected land as identified in a
permit issued under Title 15 of this article.
(4) Subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (5) AND (7) of this subsection,
an application for the following minor projects shall be accompanied by the following
application fees:
(i) Installation of:
1. One boat lift or hoist, not exceeding four boat lifts or hoists
per pier;
2. One personal watercraft lift or hoist, not exceeding six
personal watercraft lifts or hoists per pier; or
3. A combination of boat lifts or hoists and personal
watercraft lifts or hoists, not exceeding six lifts or hoists per pier, of which not more than
four lifts or hoists are boat lifts or hoists…………………………………………....[$300] $385;
(ii) Installation of a maximum of six mooring pilings…..[$300] $390;
(iii) In–kind repair and replacement of structures……...[$300] $390;
(iv) Installation of a fixed or floating platform on an existing pier
where the total platform area does not exceed 200 square feet………………….[$300] $390;
(v) Construction of a nonhabitable structure that permanently
impacts less than 1,000 square feet, such as a driveway, deck, pool, shed, or fence..[$300]
$390;
– 15 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(vi) Replacement of an existing bulkhead where the replacement
bulkhead does not exceed more than 18 inches channelward of the existing
structure…………………………………………………………………………….[$500] $650; and
(vii) In–kind repair and replacement of existing
infrastructure…………………………………………………………………………...[$500] $650.
(5) The Department may not require an application fee for:
(i) The installation of a boat lift, hoist, or personal watercraft lift on
existing pilings; or
(ii) If the existing structure is functional and there is no increase in
the original length, width, height, or channelward encroachment authorized under §
16–202, § 16–302, or § 16–307 of this article, the routine maintenance, repair, or
replacement of:
1. A highway structure;
2. A pier;
3. A boathouse;
4. A structure on a pier;
5. A bulkhead;
6. A revetment;
7. A tidal impoundment dike;
8. A water control structure;
9. An aboveground transmission facility;
10. An agricultural drainage ditch; or
11. A highway drainage ditch.
(6) The application fee for a structural shoreline stabilization project
located on or adjacent to a State–owned lake may not exceed [$250] $290.
(7) [The fees imposed under this subsection may not be modified without
legislative enactment.
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(8) (i) Subject to paragraph (7) of this subsection, the] EXCEPT AS
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ALL APPLICATIONS
FOR WETLANDS AND WATERWAYS AUTHORIZATIONS ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT
FOR ACTIVITIES PROPOSED IN A TIER II HIGH QUALITY WATERSHED SHALL BE
ACCOMPANIED BY AN ADDITIONAL APPLICATION FEE, AS FOLLOWS:
(I) FOR AN APPLICATION FOR A MINOR PROJECT OR MINOR
MODIFICATION……………………………………………………………………..$400; AND
(II) FOR AN APPLICATION FOR A MAJOR PROJECT OR MAJOR
MODIFICATION………………………………………………………………………...$1,600.
(8) (I) THE Department may adjust the fees established under
paragraphs (1), (4), and (6) of this subsection to reflect changes in the consumer price index
for all “urban consumers” for the expenditure category “all items not seasonally adjusted”,
and for all regions.
(ii) The Annual Consumer Price Index for the period ending each
December, as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor,
shall be used to adjust the fees established under paragraphs (1), (4), [and] (6), AND (7) of
this subsection.
(9) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A PUBLIC NOTICE OF THE
ADJUSTED FEES AT LEAST 90 DAYS BEFORE THE NEW FEE RATES TAKE EFFECT.
(c) (1) There is a Wetlands and Waterways Program Fund.
(2) The Department shall administer the Fund.
(3) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(4) The Fund consists of all:
(i) Application fees collected by the Department under this section;
(ii) Monetary compensation paid to the State in conjunction with a
wetlands license other than that compensation specified in § 16–205(e)(2) of this article;
(iii) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
(iv) Investment earnings, interest, and any other money from any
other source accepted for the benefit of the Fund.
– 17 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) In accordance with subsection (e) of this section, the Department shall
use the Wetlands and Waterways Program Fund for activities related to:
(i) The issuance of authorizations by the Department under §§
5–503 and 5–906 of this title and §§ 16–202, 16–302, and 16–307 of this article or the
issuance of wetlands licenses by the Board of Public Works under § 16–202 of this article;
(ii) The management, conservation, protection, and preservation of
the State’s wetlands and waterways resources, INCLUDING TIER II HIGH QUALITY
WATERS AND TIER II HIGH QUALITY WATERSHEDS; and
(iii) Program development associated with this title and Title 16 of
this article, as provided by the State budget.
(d) On or before December 31 of each year, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the Department shall prepare and submit an annual report to
the House Environment and Transportation Committee, the House Appropriations
Committee, the Senate COMMITTEE ON Education, [Health, and Environmental Affairs
Committee] ENERGY, AND THE ENVIRONMENT, and the Senate Budget and Taxation
Committee on the Wetlands and Waterways Program Fund, including an accounting of
financial receipts deposited into the Fund and expenditures from the Fund.
(e) The Department shall:
(1) Prioritize the use of the Wetlands and Waterways Program Fund to
improve the level of service to the regulated community;
(2) Identify and implement measures that will reduce delays and
duplication in the administration of the wetlands and waterways permit process, including
the processing of applications for wetlands and waterways permits in accordance with §
1–607 of this article; and
(3) In conjunction with the Department of Natural Resources, identify up
to three types of structural shoreline stabilization practices that may be implemented on
or adjacent to a State–owned lake.
5–203.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DAM SAFETY PERMIT” MEANS A PERMIT ISSUED
UNDER § 5–503 OF THIS TITLE FOR THE CONSTRUCTION, RECONSTRUCTION,
REPAIR, REMOVAL, OR MODIFICATION OF A DAM.
(B) (1) BY REGULATION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND
COLLECT A FEE TO BE PAID PRIOR TO ISSUANCE OF A DAM SAFETY PERMIT.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BASE THE FEE ON:
(I) PROJECT COST; AND
(II) THE COST TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR ADMINISTERING THE
DAM SAFETY PERMIT THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RESERVOIR, DAM,
WATERWAY OBSTRUCTION, OR SMALL POND THAT IS EXEMPT FROM PERMIT
REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 5–503(B) OF THIS TITLE.
(C) THE APPLICATION FOR A NEW DAM, OR THE ENLARGEMENT, REPAIR,
ALTERATION, OR REMOVAL OF AN EXISTING DAM, DAM SAFETY PERMIT SHALL
INCLUDE THE ESTIMATED PROJECT CONSTRUCTION COST.
(D) PERIODICALLY PRIOR TO THE ISSUANCE OF A DAM SAFETY PERMIT,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVIEW THE FEES AND IF NEEDED ADJUST THE FEES TO
ENSURE THE AMOUNT COLLECTED COVERS THE DEPARTMENT’S COSTS FOR
ADMINISTERING THE COLLECT A DAM SAFETY PERMIT FEE.
(E) THE DAM SAFETY PERMIT FEE:
(1) SHALL BE BASED ON THE ESTIMATED PROJECT CONSTRUCTION
COST; AND
(2) MAY NOT EXCEED 3% OF THE ESTIMATED PROJECT
CONSTRUCTION COST.
(F) FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PAID INTO THE
PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–509.2 OF THIS TITLE.
5–509.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) [“Asset owner” means the owner or person having control of a water
infrastructure asset.
(3)] “Association” means:
(i) A homeowners association, as defined in § 11B–101 of the Real
Property Article;
(ii) A council of unit owners, as defined in § 11–101 of the Real
Property Article; or
– 19 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) Any other entity owning or controlling a [water infrastructure
asset] DAM, the owners or members of which are owners of property adjacent to or benefited
by the [water infrastructure asset] DAM.
[(4)] (3) “Association member” means an owner or a member of an
association.
(4) “DAM OWNER” MEANS THE OWNER OR PERSON HAVING CONTROL
OF THE NORMAL OPERATION OR MAINTENANCE OF A DAM.
(5) [“Water infrastructure asset” means a reservoir, a dam, or any other
waterway construction.] “UNSAFE CONDITION” MEANS THE CONDITION OF A DAM
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO BE UNSAFE DUE TO THE STRUCTURE:
(I) BEING IN POOR CONDITION;
(II) HAVING AN INADEQUATE SPILLWAY;
(III) POSING IMMINENT DANGER OF FAILURE; OR
(IV) HAVING ANOTHER CONDITION DETERMINED UNSAFE BY
THE DEPARTMENT.
(b) (1) On complaint or the Department’s own initiative, the Department may
investigate or examine any [water infrastructure asset] DAM.
(2) If the Department determines that the [water infrastructure asset]
DAM is IN AN unsafe CONDITION, needs repair, or should be removed because the [water
infrastructure asset] DAM is unsafe and not repairable, the Department shall notify the
[asset] DAM owner in writing to repair or remove the [water infrastructure asset] DAM, as
the situation warrants.
(3) The repair or removal work shall be completed within a reasonable
time, which time shall be prescribed in the Department’s notice.
(4) (i) This paragraph applies to a [water infrastructure asset] DAM
that the Department determines meets the criteria specified in paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(ii) If the Department determines that changes to the [water
infrastructure asset] DAM, including removal of the [asset] DAM, are a priority for
improving fish passage or for other environmental benefits, the Department MAY:
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
1. [May partner] PARTNER with the [asset] DAM owner and
an organization that provides resources and expertise to plan, design, or finance changes
to [water infrastructure assets] DAMS for the purpose of repairing, removing, or retrofitting
the [asset] DAM in a manner consistent with the Department’s objectives; or
2. [Shall prioritize] PRIORITIZE the use of environmental
outcomes, as defined in § 9–1601 of this article, arising from the repair, removal, or retrofit
of the [water infrastructure asset] DAM in any environmental mitigation program
identified by the Department.
(iii) For the purpose of seeking financial assistance under Title 5,
Subtitle 4 of the Economic Development Article, if the Department determines that the
[water infrastructure asset] DAM is not a priority under subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph but is a priority for installation of less than 30 megawatts of small hydroelectric
power plant capacity, the Department shall provide notice to the Maryland Industrial
Development Financing Authority of:
1. Any [water infrastructure asset] DAM identified as a
priority for installation of less than 30 megawatts of small hydroelectric power plant
capacity under this paragraph; and
2. The repair, retrofit, or removal measures identified for the
[water infrastructure asset] DAM in the notice provided under paragraph (2) of this
subsection.
(c) If the work is not completed in the time prescribed in the notice:
(1) The Department may have the work completed at the expense of the
[asset] DAM owner;
(2) The Department shall charge the [asset] DAM owner for the costs to
complete the work; and
(3) If repayment is not made within 30 days after written demand, the
Department may bring an action in the proper court to recover the costs to complete the
work.
(d) (1) The Department may take emergency actions necessary to protect life,
property, or the environment if:
(i) 1. The Department determines that a [water infrastructure
asset] DAM is in imminent danger of failure; and
– 21 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. The [asset] DAM owner has been issued a notice by the
Department under subsection (b) of this section and has not completed the work in
accordance with the time prescribed in the notice; or
(ii) The Department determines that:
1. A [water infrastructure asset] DAM is failing OR IN
IMMINENT DANGER OF FAILING; and
2. The [asset] DAM owner is not taking adequate actions to
protect life, property, or the environment.
(2) Emergency actions taken by the Department under this subsection may
include:
(i) Taking control of the [water infrastructure asset] DAM;
(ii) Lowering the level of water impounded by the [water
infrastructure asset] DAM by releasing the impounded water or by other means;
(iii) Completely releasing all water impounded by the [water
infrastructure asset] DAM;
(iv) Performing any necessary remedial or protective work at the site
of the [water infrastructure asset] DAM, including breaching the [water infrastructure
asset] DAM; and
(v) Taking any other steps the Department deems necessary to
safeguard life, property, or the environment.
(3) The Department or its agents may enter any property, without prior
notice to the owner of the property, if the entry is necessary to carry out emergency actions
under this subsection.
(4) If the Department takes control of a [water infrastructure asset] DAM
under paragraph (2)(i) of this subsection, the Department shall remain in charge and
control of the [water infrastructure asset] DAM until the Department has determined that
the [water infrastructure asset] DAM has been rendered safe or the circumstances
requiring the emergency actions have ceased.
(5) The Department may obtain equipment, personnel, and other resources
for emergency actions taken under this subsection through any appropriate means,
including emergency procurements under § 13–108 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(e) (1) Costs incurred by the Department under this section shall:
(i) Constitute a debt owed to the State; and
(ii) Be reimbursed to the Department by the [asset] DAM owner.
(2) If any such cost remains unreimbursed 30 days after the Department
makes a demand for reimbursement from the [asset] DAM owner, the [water infrastructure
asset] DAM shall be subject to the establishment of a lien in accordance with this section
for the payment of the unreimbursed amount.
(f) (1) With respect to costs incurred by the Department under this section
relating to a [water infrastructure asset] DAM for which an association is the [asset] DAM
owner, if any such cost remains unreimbursed 30 days after the Department makes a
demand for reimbursement from the association, such costs shall be a debt to the State
owed, and shall be reimbursed to the Department, by the association members, jointly and
severally, notwithstanding any provision of law that would otherwise relieve the
association members of such liability.
(2) If any such cost remains unreimbursed 30 days after the Department
makes a demand for reimbursement from the association members, the lots, condominium
units, or other property owned by the association members that is adjacent to or benefited
by the [water infrastructure asset] DAM shall be subject to the establishment of a lien in
accordance with this section for the payment of the unreimbursed amount.
(g) (1) Any lien arising under subsections (e) and (f) of this section shall, to the
extent not otherwise expressly prohibited by law, have priority over all other liens and
encumbrances perfected after July 1, 2020, on the [water infrastructure asset] DAM, or the
lots, condominium units, or other property owned by the association members that is
adjacent to or benefited by the [water infrastructure asset] DAM.
(2) The establishment and enforcement of liens arising under subsections
(e) and (f) of this section shall be governed by the rules set forth in Title 12, Chapter 300 of
the Maryland Rules.
(h) No action may be brought against the State, the Department, or their
respective agents or employees for the recovery of damages caused by the partial or total
failure of any [water infrastructure asset] DAM, or the control or operation of any [water
infrastructure asset] DAM, on the ground that the State, the Department, or their
respective agents or employees are liable by virtue of any of the following:
(1) The approval or permitting of the [water infrastructure asset] DAM;
(2) The issuance or enforcement of orders relative to maintenance or
operation of the [water infrastructure asset] DAM;
– 23 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Control or regulation of the [water infrastructure asset] DAM;
(4) Actions taken to protect against failure during an emergency, including
any actions taken under this subsection;
(5) The use of design and construction criteria prepared, approved, or
promulgated by the Department; or
(6) The failure to issue or enforce orders, to control or regulate [water
infrastructure assets] DAMS, to take measures to protect against any failure thereof, or to
take any emergency actions contemplated by this subsection.
(i) Nothing in this section, and no act or omission of the Department under this
section, shall be construed to relieve [an asset] A DAM owner of:
(1) The legal duties, obligations, or liabilities incident to the ownership or
operation of a [water infrastructure asset] DAM; or
(2) Any liability for acts or omissions of the [asset] DAM owner that cause
injury or death to any person, damage to any property or the environment, or violation of
any law, regulation, or permit, even if acts or omissions of the Department under this
section could be deemed an intervening cause of such injury, death, damage, or violation.
(j) This section does not apply to farm ponds used for agricultural purposes.
5–509.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “DAM OWNER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–509
OF THIS SUBTITLE MEANS THE OWNER OR PERSON HAVING CONTROL OF THE
NORMAL OPERATION OR MAINTENANCE OF A DAM.
(B) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A DAM THAT IS:
(I) INCLUDED IN THE MARYLAND DAM INVENTORY; AND
(II) NOT OWNED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A DAM OWNED BY THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT RESERVOIR, DAM, WATERWAY OBSTRUCTION, OR SMALL
POND THAT IS EXEMPT FROM PERMIT REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 5–503(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SUBTITLE, ALL DAM OWNERS
SHALL REGISTER THEIR DAMS ANNUALLY WITH THE DEPARTMENT.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(D) TO BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, TO REGISTER WITH THE
DEPARTMENT, A DAM OWNER SHALL:
(1) SUBMIT AN APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT ON THE FORM
PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) PAY TO THE DEPARTMENT A REGISTRATION FEE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT REGISTRATION FEE SHALL BE:
(1) ESTABLISH THE REGISTRATION FEE BY REGULATION FOR A LOW
HAZARD CLASS DAM, $200; AND
(2) BASE THE REGISTRATION FEE ON THE DAM HAZARD
CLASSIFICATION FOR A SIGNIFICANT HAZARD CLASS DAM, $500; AND
(3) FOR A HIGH HAZARD CLASS DAM, $1,000.
(F) REGISTRATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE PAID
INTO THE PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 5–509.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(G) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH CRITERIA TO FULLY OR
PARTIALLY WAIVE THE REGISTRATION FEE UNDER THIS SECTION DUE TO FINANCIAL
HARDSHIP.
(2) THE WAIVER CRITERIA ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PRIORITIZE INDIVIDUAL HOMEOWNERS.
5–509.2.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DAM OWNER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–509 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) (I) “ELIGIBLE COST” MEANS ANY COST TO BE INCURRED BY A
DAM OWNER FOR THE REPAIR, EMERGENCY REPAIR, OR PERMANENT BREACH OF A
DAM.
– 25 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) “ELIGIBLE COST” INCLUDES CONSTRUCTION ACTIVITIES,
ENGINEERING FEES, DEMOLITION, EXCAVATION, STABILIZATION, AND RELATED
COSTS.
(4) “FUND” MEANS THE PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND.
(5) “LOAN” MEANS A PRIVATE DAM REPAIR LOAN MADE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(6) “PRIVATE DAM” MEANS A DAM THAT IS NOT OWNED BY THE
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE GOVERNMENT, OR A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
GOVERNMENT.
(7) “UNSAFE CONDITION” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 5–509 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE FOR THE REPAIR, UPGRADE, OR REMOVAL OF PRIVATE DAMS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) THE MARYLAND WATER INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCING
ADMINISTRATION WITHIN THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(C) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(D) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) DAM SAFETY PERMIT FEES COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER § 5–203.2 OF THIS TITLE;
(2) DAM OWNER REGISTRATION FEES COLLECTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT UNDER § 5–509.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(3) PAYMENTS RECEIVED FROM BORROWERS FOR DEPOSIT INTO THE
FUND IN REPAYMENT OF LOANS ISSUED UNDER SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING ANY LOAN ORIGINATION FEES;
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(4) PENALTIES DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 5–514(C)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(5) FUNDS APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(6) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(7) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(E) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(1) PROVIDING FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO PRIVATE DAM OWNERS
FOR DEPARTMENT–DIRECTED UPGRADES, REPAIRS, OR REMOVALS;
(2) MAKING LOANS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION;
(3) FUNDING EMERGENCY REPAIRS AND REMOVALS OF PRIVATE
DAMS PERFORMED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(4) REIMBURSING THE ADMINISTRATIVE COST TO THE DEPARTMENT
OF PROCESSING AND ISSUING DAM SAFETY PERMITS AND PERFORMING THE DUTIES
UNDER § 5–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(F) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST MONEY OF THE FUND IN
THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(G) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(H) (1) (I) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2028, THE DEPARTMENT MAY PROVIDE
LOANS FROM THE FUND TO OWNERS OF PRIVATE DAMS FOR THE PURPOSE OF
REPAIRING OR REMOVING PRIVATE DAMS DEEMED TO BE IN AN UNSAFE CONDITION
BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) LOANS MADE UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
ADMINISTERED BY THE MARYLAND WATER INFRASTRUCTURE FINANCING
ADMINISTRATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 9–1604 AND 9–1606 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH CRITERIA FOR
AWARDING LOANS UNDER THE FUND.
– 27 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS MAY INCLUDE DAM OWNERS THAT:
1. HAVE AN APPROVED EMERGENCY ACTION PLAN IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–503.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
2. HAVE HAD AN INSPECTION OF THE PRIVATE DAM
PERFORMED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT DOCUMENTS DEFICIENCIES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE WITHIN THE PAST 24 MONTHS;
3. CAN DEMONSTRATE, WITH DOCUMENTATION,
ACTIONS TAKEN TO ADDRESS DEFICIENCIES INDICATED IN INSPECTION REPORTS
PREPARED BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
4. HAVE DEMONSTRATED AN ABILITY TO REPAY A LOAN.
(3) EACH LOAN MAY BE IN AN AMOUNT THAT COVERS THE
REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ELIGIBLE COSTS OF A PROJECT, AS DETERMINED BY
THE DEPARTMENT, FOR WHICH FUNDS ARE SOUGHT BY THE APPLICANT AND THAT
ARE NOT PROVIDED BY OTHER AVAILABLE SOURCES.
(4) A DAM OWNER MAY USE MULTIPLE PROGRAMS OR SOURCES TO
FUND THE REPAIR OR REMOVAL COSTS FOR A DAM IN AN UNSAFE CONDITION UP TO
100% OF THE COSTS.
(5) A DAM OWNER SEEKING A LOAN SHALL SUBMIT A COMPLETE LOAN
APPLICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT ON A FORM PROVIDED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(6) THE REPAYMENT PERIOD FOR A LOAN MAY NOT EXCEED 20
YEARS.
(7) THE LOAN SHALL BE MADE AT OR BELOW MARKET INTEREST
RATES.
(8) THE DEPARTMENT MAY CHARGE A LOAN ORIGINATION FEE THAT
MAY BE USED FOR THE REASONABLE COST OF ADMINISTERING THE LOAN PROGRAM.
(9) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A DAM OWNER DOES
NOT HAVE THE FINANCIAL RESOURCES TO REPAY A LOAN GRANTED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY, AT THE DEPARTMENT’S DISCRETION,
AUTHORIZE PARTIAL FORGIVENESS OF THE LOAN.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(10) FULL REPAYMENT OF THE LOAN SHALL BE REQUIRED ON SALE OR
TRANSFER OF THE PROPERTY.
(11) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH REMEDIES FOR LOAN
RECIPIENTS WHO FAIL TO MEET REPAYMENT OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE LOAN
TERMS.
(II) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER ACTION AUTHORIZED BY THIS
SUBTITLE, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION TO RECOVER
PRINCIPAL, INTEREST, LATE FEES AND PENALTIES, ATTORNEY’S FEES, AND COSTS
FROM ANY LOAN RECIPIENT THAT DEFAULTS ON THE LOAN RECIPIENT’S
OBLIGATIONS UNDER THE LOAN AGREEMENT.
(III) 1. IN THE EVENT OF A DEFAULT ON A LOAN OBLIGATION
ISSUED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY PLACE A LIEN AGAINST
THE PROPERTY THAT, SUBJECT TO THE TAX LIENS OF THE FEDERAL, STATE, AND
LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, SHALL HAVE THE SAME PRIORITY AND STATUS AS A LIEN OF
THE STATE FOR UNPAID TAXES UNDER §§ 14–804 AND 14–805 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
2. THE DEPARTMENT MAY EXERCISE THE SAME RIGHTS
AND POWERS IN ENFORCING THE LIEN AND COLLECTING FUNDS FOR THE PAYMENT
OF AMOUNTS IN DEFAULT UNDER THE LOAN OBLIGATION AS THE STATE MAY
EXERCISE IN COLLECTING UNPAID TAXES UNDER TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 8 OF THE
TAX – PROPERTY ARTICLE.
(12) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SUBSECTION.
(I) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2026, AND EACH NOVEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, SUBJECT
TO § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(1) THE STATUS OF THE FUND;
(2) REVENUES, ENCUMBRANCES TO, AND EXPENDITURES FROM THE
FUND;
(3) A DESCRIPTION OF THE PROJECTS FUNDED BY THE FUND; AND
(4) THE NUMBER OF APPLICATIONS FOR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE
FROM THE FUND THAT WERE DENIED.
5–514.
– 29 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In addition to being subject to an injunctive action under this subtitle,
a person who violates any provision of this subtitle [relating to water appropriation and
use] or any [rule,] regulation, order, or permit adopted or issued under [any such provision]
THIS SUBTITLE is liable for a civil penalty not exceeding [$5,000] $10,000 per violation
to be collected in a civil action brought by the Department.
(2) Each day a violation occurs or continues is a separate violation under
this subsection.
(3) (i) Before bringing a civil action against a local government under
this subsection, the Department shall meet and consult with the local government to seek
an alternative resolution to the contested issue.
(ii) Prior consultation by the Department with the local government
shall constitute compliance with this subsection.
(b) A person who violates a provision of this subtitle or a regulation adopted under
this subtitle is subject to the penalties provided in § 9–343 of this article.
(c) (1) [All] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, ALL funds collected by the Department under this section, including any
civil penalty or any fine imposed by a court under the provisions of this section, shall be
paid into the Maryland Clean Water Fund.
(2) FUNDS COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION
RELATING TO AN UNSAFE CONDITION, AS DEFINED IN § 5–509 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
SHALL BE PAID INTO THE PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND.
6–843.
(a) (1) Except as provided in this subsection and subsection (b) of this section,
and in cooperation with the Department of Housing and Community Development, the
State Department of Assessments and Taxation, and other appropriate governmental
units, the Department shall provide for the collection of [an annual] A fee for every rental
dwelling unit in the State.
(2) [The annual fee for an affected property is $30] FOR AN AFFECTED
PROPERTY, THE FEE:
(I) IS $120; AND
(II) SHALL BE COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT ONCE EVERY
2 YEARS.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(3) (i) 1. Subject to the provisions of subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of
this paragraph, on or before December 31, 2000, the [annual] fee for a rental dwelling unit
built after 1949 that is not an affected property is $5.
2. After December 31, 2000, there is no [annual] fee for a
rental dwelling unit built after 1949 that is not an affected property.
(ii) The owner of a rental dwelling unit built after 1949 that is not
an affected property may not be required to pay the fee provided under this paragraph if
the owner certifies to the Department that the rental dwelling unit is lead free pursuant to
§ 6–804 of this subtitle.
(iii) An owner of a rental dwelling unit who submits a report to the
Department that the rental dwelling unit is lead free pursuant to § 6–804 of this subtitle
shall include a [$10] $50 processing fee with the report.
(b) The fees imposed under this section do not apply to any rental dwelling unit:
(1) Built after 1978; or
(2) Owned and operated by a unit of federal, State, or local government, or
any public, quasi–public, or municipal corporation.
(c) (1) The fee imposed under this section shall be paid on or before December
31, 1995, or the date of registration of the affected property under Part III of this subtitle
and on or before December 31 [of each] EVERY OTHER year thereafter or according to a
schedule established by the Department by regulation.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH A PROTOCOL TO STAGGER
REGISTRATIONS OF AFFECTED PROPERTY UNDER PART III OF THIS SUBTITLE TO
EQUALLY DIVIDE REGISTRATIONS OVER SEQUENTIAL CALENDAR YEARS.
(d) An owner who fails to pay the fee imposed under this section is liable for a
civil penalty of up to triple the amount of each registration fee unpaid that, together with
all costs of collection, including reasonable attorney’s fees, shall be collected in a civil action
in any court of competent jurisdiction.
7–503.
(a) There is a Voluntary Cleanup Program in the Department.
(b) The purpose of the Voluntary Cleanup Program is to:
(1) Encourage the investigation of eligible properties with known or
perceived contamination;
– 31 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Protect public health and the environment where cleanup projects are
being performed or need to be performed;
(3) Accelerate cleanup of eligible properties; and
(4) Provide predictability and finality to the cleanup of eligible properties.
7–506.
(a) (1) To participate in the Program, an applicant shall:
(i) Submit an application, on a form provided by the Department,
that includes:
1. Information demonstrating to the satisfaction of the
Department that the contamination did not result from the applicant knowingly or willfully
violating any law or regulation concerning controlled hazardous substances;
2. Information demonstrating the person’s status as a
responsible person or an inculpable person;
3. Information demonstrating that the property is an eligible
property as defined in § 7–501 of this subtitle;
4. A detailed report with all available relevant information
on environmental conditions including contamination at the eligible property known to the
applicant at the time of the application;
5. An environmental site assessment that includes:
A. Established Phase I site assessment standards and follows
principles established by the American Society for Testing and Materials and that
demonstrates to the satisfaction of the Department that the assessment has been conducted
in accordance with those standards and principles; and
B. A Phase II site assessment unless the Department
concludes, after review of the Phase I site assessment, that there is sufficient information
to determine that there are no recognized environmental conditions, as defined by the
American Society for Testing and Materials; and
6. A description, in summary form, of a proposed voluntary
cleanup project that includes the proposed cleanup criteria under § 7–508 of this subtitle
and the proposed future use of the property, if appropriate; and
(ii) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, pay to the
Department:
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
1. An initial application fee of [$6,000] $10,000 which the
Department may reduce on a demonstration of financial hardship in accordance with
subsection (b) of this section;
2. An application fee of $2,000 for each application submitted
subsequent to the initial application for the same property; [and]
3. An application fee of $2,000 for each application submitted
subsequent to the initial application for contiguous or adjacent properties that are part of
the same planned unit development or a similar development plan; AND
4. IF THE DIRECT COSTS OF REVIEW OF THE
APPLICATION AND ADMINISTRATION AND OVERSIGHT OF THE RESPONSE ACTION
PLAN EXCEED THE APPLICATION FEE, THE ADDITIONAL COSTS INCURRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) If an applicant certifies that the applicant intends to use the eligible
property to generate clean or renewable energy, the Department shall waive the fees
required under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection.
(b) The Department shall adopt regulations to establish criteria for determining
whether an applicant has:
(1) Demonstrated financial hardship; or
(2) Certified that the applicant intends to use the eligible property to
generate clean or renewable energy.
9–283.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, by regulation, the
Department shall establish and collect a fee to be paid by a generator of coal combustion
by–products, based on a per ton rate of coal combustion by–products generated by the
generator annually.
(b) The Department shall base the fees on the following factors:
(1) The total annual tonnage of coal combustion by–products that the
generator generates;
(2) The type and volume of coal combustion by–products generated by the
generator;
(3) Whether the generator uses or disposes of the coal combustion
by–products;
– 33 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(4) To the extent that the coal combustion by–products are used rather
than disposed of, the types of the uses;
(5) Whether the coal combustion by–products are transported for use or
disposal out–of–state; [and]
(6) THE VOLUME OF COAL COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS THAT HAVE
BEEN DISPOSED OF AND REMAIN IN LANDFILLS OR OTHER STORAGE UNITS IN THE
STATE THAT ARE SUBJECT TO INSPECTION AND MONITORING, NOT INCLUDING COAL
COMBUSTION BY–PRODUCTS THAT HAVE BEEN:
(I) ADDED TO CEMENT PRODUCTS;
(II) USED IN COAL MINE RECLAMATION; OR
(III) BENEFICIALLY REUSED IN A MANNER ACCEPTABLE TO THE
DEPARTMENT; AND
(7) Other factors the Department considers appropriate.
(c) The Department may not establish or impose a fee on coal combustion
by–products that are:
(1) Beneficially used, as the Department determines; or
(2) Used for coal mine reclamation in accordance with regulations the
Department adopts or with regulations of the receiving state.
(d) Fees imposed on coal combustion by–products that are transported for use or
disposal out–of–state may not exceed 50% of the fees established for disposal in–State.
(e) The fees collected by the Department under this section shall be deposited into
the Fund and used in accordance with § 9–284 of this subtitle.
(f) The fees imposed shall be set at the rate necessary to implement the purposes
set forth in § 9–284 of this subtitle.
(g) In any fiscal year, if the fee schedule established by the Department generates
revenue that exceeds the amount necessary to operate a regulatory program to control the
management of coal combustion by–products, the Department shall reduce the fees in the
following fiscal year.
9–320.
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(b) The following payments shall be made into the Maryland Clean Water Fund:
(1) All application fees, permit fees, renewal fees, and funds collected by
the Department under this subtitle, including any civil or administrative penalty or any
fine imposed by a court under the provisions of this subtitle;
(2) Any civil penalty or any fine imposed by a court under the provisions of
Title 5, Subtitle 5 of this article relating to water appropriation and use;
(3) Any civil or administrative penalty or any fine imposed by a court under
the provisions of Title 4, Subtitle 1 of this article;
(4) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 2, Part
III of this title and §§ 9–269 and 9–270 of this title and any civil or administrative penalty
or fine imposed by a court under the provisions of Subtitle 2 of this title; [and]
(5) Any fees or funds that the Department collects under Subtitle 24 of this
title and any civil or administrative penalty or fine imposed by a court under the provisions
of Subtitle 24 of this title; AND
(6) ANY OTHER FEES LEGALLY AUTHORIZED TO BE PAID INTO THE
MARYLAND CLEAN WATER FUND.
9–1606.
(a) (1) A loan made by the Administration shall be evidenced by a loan
agreement.
(2) Loans made from the Water Quality Fund, except for loans made in
accordance with § 9–1605(d)(9) of this subtitle, shall be subject to the provisions of §
9–1605(d)(1) of this subtitle.
(3) Loans made from the Drinking Water Loan Fund, except for loans made
in accordance with § 9–1605.1(d)(10) of this subtitle, shall be subject to the provisions of §
9–1605.1(d)(1) of this subtitle.
(4) LOANS MADE FROM THE PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND SHALL BE
SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF § 5–509.2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(5) Subject to the provisions of any applicable bond resolution, the
Administration may consent to the modification, with respect to rate of interest, time of
payment of any installment of principal or interest, security, or any other term of any loan
agreement or loan obligation.
(6) In connection with any security received by or owned by the
Administration, including any loan obligations, the Administration may commence any
– 35 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
action to protect or enforce the rights conferred upon it by any law or loan agreement or
loan obligation.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of public general or public local law,
charter, or ordinance, a borrower may issue and sell loan obligations to the Administration:
(1) At private sale, without public bidding;
(2) Without regard to any limitations on the denomination of such
obligations; and
(3) At any interest rate or cost or at any price that the borrower considers
necessary or desirable.
(c) A borrower may pay any fees or charges necessary to enable the
Administration to sell its bonds, including any fees for the insurance of its loan obligations
or bonds of the Administration, or to provide any other guarantee, credit enhancement, or
additional security for any such loan obligations or bonds.
(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of public general or public local
law, charter, or ordinance, a borrower may agree with the Administration to pledge any
[moneys] MONEY that the borrower is entitled to receive from the State, including the
borrower’s share of the State income tax, to secure its obligations under a loan agreement.
(2) The State Comptroller and the State Treasurer shall cause any
[moneys] MONEY withheld under such a pledge to be paid to, or applied at the direction of,
the Administration.
(e) Each loan agreement shall contain a provision whereby the borrower
acknowledges and agrees that [the]:
(1) THE borrower’s loan obligation is cancelable only upon repayment in
full; and [that neither]
(2) NEITHER the Administration, the Secretary, nor the Board is
authorized to forgive the repayment of all or any portion of the loan, except for [loans]:
(I) LOANS to disadvantaged communities, pursuant to the federal
Safe Drinking Water Act[, and loans];
(II) LOANS made in accordance with §§ 9–1605(d)(9) and
9–1605.1(d)(10) of this subtitle; AND
(III) LOANS MADE IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–509.2(H) OF THIS
ARTICLE.
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(f) (1) In the event of a default on a loan obligation by a borrower other than
a local government, the Administration may place a lien against property of the borrower
securing the loan which, subject to the tax liens of the federal, State, and local governments,
shall have the same priority and status as a lien of the State for unpaid taxes under §§
14–804 and 14–805 of the Tax – Property Article.
(2) The Administration may exercise the same rights and powers in
enforcing such lien and collecting funds for the payment of amounts in default under the
loan obligation as the State may exercise in collecting unpaid taxes under Title 14, Subtitle
8 of the Tax – Property Article.
15–807.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person may not engage in
surface mining within the State without first obtaining a surface mining license.
(b) (1) An application for a license shall be in writing and on a form prepared
and furnished by the Department.
(2) If the application is made by a corporation, partnership, or association
[it] THE APPLICATION shall contain information concerning its officers, directors, and
principal owners, as the Department reasonably requires.
(c) (1) The application shall be accompanied by a [$300] $500 fee.
(2) (I) The license shall be renewable annually[, and the].
(II) THE renewal fee is [$150] $300.
(III) The application for renewal shall be made annually by January
1.
(d) The Department may not issue any new surface mining license or renew any
existing surface mining license to any person if it finds, after investigation, that the
applicant has failed and continues to fail to comply with any of the provisions of this
subtitle.
(e) A license under this section is not required for the following activities:
(1) Those aspects of deep mining that do not have a significant effect on the
surface, if the affected land does not exceed 3 acres in area;
(2) Operations engaged in processing minerals;
– 37 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Excavation or grading conducted solely in aid of on–site farming or
on–site construction for purposes other than surface mining;
(4) Removal of overburden and mining of limited amounts of any mineral
when done only for the purpose of prospecting and to the extent necessary to determine the
location, quantity, or quality of any natural deposit, if no minerals are sold, processed for
sale, or consumed in the regular operation of business;
(5) The handling, processing, or storage of slag and stone on the premises
of a manufacturer as a part of any manufacturing process that requires stone as a raw
material or produces slag as a by–product;
(6) The extraction of minerals by a landowner for the landowner’s own
noncommercial use from land owned or leased by the landowner;
(7) Mining operations if the affected land does not exceed 1 acre in area;
(8) Dredging from submerged public or private lands in the State if this
activity is conducted under a license from the State Board of Public Works or by permit
from the Department, as provided for in Title 16 of this article; or
(9) The extraction of sand, gravel, rock, stone, earth, or fill from borrow pits
for highway construction purposes or other public facilities, if the work is performed under
a bond, a contract, and the specifications of the Department that require reclamation of the
area affected in the manner provided by this subtitle.
(f) (1) Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a
misdemeanor and, on conviction, is subject to a fine of not more than $10,000.
(2) The fine shall be paid to the Surface Mined Land Reclamation Fund.
15–815.
(a) (1) Any permittee engaged in surface mining under a surface mining
permit may apply at any time for modification of the permit.
(2) The application shall be in writing on forms furnished by the
Department and fully state the information called for. [In addition, the]
(3) THE applicant may be required to furnish [other] ADDITIONAL
information THAT the Department reasonably deems necessary to enforce this subtitle.
[However, it is not necessary to resubmit information which has not changed since the
original application, if the applicant so states in writing]
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(4) IF AN APPLICANT STATES IN WRITING THAT INFORMATION HAS
NOT CHANGED SINCE THE ORIGINAL APPLICATION, THE APPLICANT DOES NOT HAVE
TO RESUBMIT THAT INFORMATION.
(b) (1) A modification under this section may affect [the]:
(I) THE land area covered by the permit[, the];
(II) THE approved mining and reclamation plan coupled with the
permit[, or other]; OR
(III) OTHER terms and conditions of the permit.
(2) (I) A permit may be modified to include land contiguous to the
existing affected land, but not other lands.
(II) The mining and reclamation plan may be modified in any
manner, if the Department determines that the modified plan fully meets the standards
set forth in § 15–822 of this subtitle and that the modifications would be generally
consistent with the bases for the issuance of the original permit.
(III) Other terms and conditions may be modified only if the
Department determines that the permit as modified would meet the requirements of §§
15–808 and 15–810 of this subtitle. [No]
(IV) A modification may NOT extend the expiration date of any
permit issued under this subtitle.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a [$100] $200
fee shall be charged for a permit modification.
(d) (1) In addition to the fee required in subsection (c) of this section, a fee shall
be charged equal to [$12] $75 for each additional acre of affected land over and above the
amount of land covered in the original permit, for each year of operation.
(2) The additional fee may not exceed [$1,000 per year]:
(I) $10,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2026;
(II) $10,500 IN FISCAL YEAR 2027;
(III) $11,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2028;
(IV) $11,500 IN FISCAL YEAR 2029; AND
– 39 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(V) $12,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2030 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER.
(e) The Department shall approve and grant the permit modification requested
as expeditiously as possible but not later than 30 days after the application forms or any
supplemental information required are filed with the Department.
(f) The Department may deny the permit modification on finding:
(1) An uncorrected violation of the type listed in § 15–810(b)(7) of this
subtitle;
(2) Failure to submit an adequate mining and reclamation plan in light of
conditions existing at the time of the modification; or
(3) Failure or refusal to pay the modification fee.
(g) If the Department denies an application to modify a permit, the Department
shall give the permittee written notice of:
(1) The Department’s determination;
(2) Any changes in the application which would make it acceptable; and
(3) The permittee’s right to a hearing at a stated time and place.
(h) The date for the hearing may not be less than 15 days nor more than 30 days
after the date of the notice unless the Department and the permittee mutually agree on
another date.
15–816.
(a) (1) The procedure to be followed and standards to be applied in renewing a
permit shall be the same as those for the initial application for a permit[, except that it is
not necessary to resubmit information which has not changed since the time of the original
application, if the applicant so states in writing. However, the applicant may be required].
(2) IF AN APPLICANT STATES IN WRITING THAT INFORMATION HAS
NOT CHANGED SINCE THE ORIGINAL APPLICATION, THE APPLICANT DOES NOT HAVE
TO RESUBMIT THAT INFORMATION.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE AN APPLICANT to furnish other
information the Department deems necessary to evaluate the renewal request.
– 40 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
(4) In the absence of any changes in legal requirements for the issuance of
a permit since the date on which the original permit was issued, the only basis for the denial
of a renewal permit shall be:
[(1)] (I) An uncorrected violation of the type listed in § 15–810(b)(7) of
this subtitle;
[(2)] (II) Failure to submit an adequate mining and reclamation plan in
light of conditions existing at the time of renewal; or
[(3)] (III) Failure or refusal to pay the renewal fee.
(b) Application for a renewal of a permit cannot be made any earlier than 1 year
prior to the expiration date of the original permit.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, the fee to be
charged for a permit renewal shall be [$12 for each acre of affected land for each year of
operation, but not exceeding $1,000 per year]:
(1) FOR AN OPERATOR WITH 5 ACRES OR LESS OF AFFECTED LAND,
$120 FOR EACH YEAR OF OPERATION; OR
(2) FOR AN OPERATOR WITH MORE THAN 5 ACRES OF AFFECTED
LAND, $75 FOR EACH ACRE OF AFFECTED LAND FOR EACH YEAR OF OPERATION BUT
NOT EXCEEDING:
(I) $10,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2026;
(II) $10,500 IN FISCAL YEAR 2027;
(III) $11,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2028;
(IV) $11,500 IN FISCAL YEAR 2029; AND
(V) $12,000 IN FISCAL YEAR 2030 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR
THEREAFTER.
(d) The fee shall be paid annually during the term of the permit.
(e) (1) If the term of a permit which is renewed exceeds 5 years, the permittee
shall pay additional fees, based on the formula in subsection (c) of this section, for each
5–year portion of the term of the renewed permit.
(2) These additional fees shall be paid to the Department within 1 year
before the completion of any 5–year portion of the term of the permit.
– 41 –

Ch. 432 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(f) If the Department denies an application to renew a permit, the Department
shall give the permittee written notice of:
(1) The Department’s determination;
(2) Any changes in the application that would make it acceptable; and
(3) The permittee’s right to a hearing at a stated time and place.
(g) The date for the hearing may not be less than 15 days nor more than 30 days
after the date of the notice unless the Department and the permittee mutually agree on
another date.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE PRIVATE DAM REPAIR FUND.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 4–411(e) through
(g) of Article – Environment of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be
Section(s) 4–411(d) through (f), respectively.
– 42 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 432
SECTION 4. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act may not be
construed to expand the definition or scope of what is considered a dam under State law
and regulation.
SECTION 5. 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 2, 3, and 4 of this
Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Department of the
Environment shall notify the owner of a dam included in the Maryland Dam Inventory of
the registration fee required under § 5–509.1 of the Environment Article, as enacted by
Section 2 of this Act, as follows:
(1) on or before October 1, 2025; and
(2) on or before October 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
5 4 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 43 –